Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1322
Escrow account; distribution.

Within thirty days after the decision of the arbitration board, the funds and investments in the escrow account established pursuant to section 70-1305, together with the interest thereon, shall be distributed or apportioned in accordance with the decision of the arbitration board.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 22.